Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-2703
Model memorandum of understanding; department; develop and distribute; school district; superintendent; duties.

(1) On or before December 1, 2019, the department shall develop and distribute a model memorandum of understanding that includes the policies required by section 79-2704. Any law enforcement agency or security agency required to adopt a memorandum of understanding with a school district pursuant to this section that has not developed and adopted a different written memorandum of understanding shall adopt the model memorandum of understanding developed by the department.

(2) On and after January 1, 2021, any law enforcement agency which provides school resource officers and any security agency which provides security guards to schools in a school district shall have in effect the model memorandum of understanding or a different written memorandum of understanding with such school district as adopted by such law enforcement agency or security agency. Such different written memorandum of understanding shall be substantially similar to the model memorandum of understanding, shall include provisions in conformance with the minimum standards set forth in the model memorandum of understanding, and may include any other procedures and provisions the school district and the law enforcement agency or security agency mutually deem appropriate.

(3) The superintendent of a school district required to adopt a memorandum of understanding under this section shall, within three months after its adoption, provide a copy of such memorandum of understanding to the department or publicly post such memorandum of understanding on the school district website.

(4) On or before January 1, 2021, and each January 1 thereafter, when any school district required to adopt a memorandum of understanding under this section has made any change to its memorandum of understanding, in conjunction with the law enforcement agency or security agency, in the preceding year, the superintendent of such school district shall provide an updated copy of such memorandum of understanding to the department or publicly post such memorandum of understanding on the school district website.

Laws 2019, LB390, § 3.